Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-909.02
Wind energy conversion system, defined.

Wind energy conversion system shall mean any device, supporting structure, mechanism, or series of mechanisms that uses wind for the production of electricity or a mechanical application.

Laws 1997, LB 140, § 4.